Missouri, session 2026, HB3036.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 94, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 94.451, to read as follows:
94.451. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Campground", real property:
(a) That contains parcels for rent to transient guests for pay or compensation;
(b) That may include temporary utility hook-ups for use by the transient guests;
and
(c) Where such transient guests generally use tents, recreational vehicles, or
some other form of temporary shelter while on the rented premises;
(2) "Transient guests", individuals who occupy a room or rooms in a hotel or
motel or a campground site for thirty-one days or less during any calendar quarter.
2. (1) The governing body of a city with more than two thousand seven hundred
but fewer than three thousand inhabitants and located in a county with more than fifty
thousand but fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than seventeen thousand but fewer than twenty-one thousand inhabitants may impose a
tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms or campground sites paid by the transient
guests of hotels, motels, or campgrounds situated in the city or a portion thereof.
(2) Such tax shall be not more than five percent per occupied room or
campground site per night. The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3036 2
charge for the sleeping room or campground site and all other taxes imposed by law.
Such tax shall be stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
(3) The proceeds of such tax shall be used by the city for general revenue
purposes.
3. (1) Such tax shall not become effective unless the governing body of the city
submits to the voters of the city at a state general or primary election a proposal to
authorize the governing body of the city to impose a tax under this section.
(2) The ballot of submission for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form: "Shall ______ (insert the name of the city) impose a
tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms or campground sites paid by the transient
guests of hotels or motels or campgrounds situated in ______ (name of city) at a rate of _
_____ (insert rate of percent) percent for general revenue purposes?".
(3) If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are in favor of the question, the tax shall become effective on the first day of the
second calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held.
If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are
opposed to the question, the tax authorized by this section shall not become effective
unless and until the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters of
the city and such question is approved by a majority of the qualified voters of the city
voting on the question.
✔